Alabama, session 2026rs, HB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 13A-10-240, 13A-10-241, and
13A-10-242, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
follows:
"§13A-10-240
As used in this article, the following terms have the
following meanings:
(1) PROPERTY. Personal or real property. The term
includes, but is not limited to, any of the following
buildings or real property:
a. A church, mosque, synagogue, or other religious real
property.
b. A public or private school.
(2) THREATEN. A person threatens another if all of the
Page 1

(2) THREATEN. A person threatens another if all of the
HB188 Engrossed
following occur:
a. The person intentionally and knowingly makes a
statement verbally, in writing, by means of an electronic
communication device, or by any other means to harm a person
or property.
b. The statement is communicated to another person.
c. Under the circumstances, the threatened harm is
credible and imminent.
d. The statement, on its face and under the
circumstances in which it is made, is so unequivocal,
immediate, and specific as to convey to the person threatened,
a gravity of purpose and an immediate prospect of execution of
the threat.
e. The statement causes the person to reasonably be in
sustained fear for his or her own safety or for the object of
the threat.
(3) WEAPONS OF MASS DESTRUCTION. Any of the following:
a. A destructive device as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921.
b. A weapon that is designed or intended to cause death
or serious bodily injury through the release, dissemination,
or impact of toxic or poisonous chemicals.
c. A weapon involving a biological agent, toxin, or
vector, as those terms are defined in 18 U.S.C. § 178.
d. A weapon that is designed to release radiation or
radioactivity at a level dangerous to human life."
"§13A-10-241
(a) A person commits the crime of making a terrorist
threat in the first degree when he or she, based on an
Page 2

threat in the first degree when he or she, based on an
HB188 Engrossed
objective evaluation, credibly threatens to commit a crime of
violence against a person or to damage any property by use of
a bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, firearm, deadly
weapon, or other mechanism and any of the following occurs:
(1) The threat causes the evacuation of any real
property.
(2) The threat causes the disruption of a school,
church, or government activity.
(3) The threat is with intent to retaliate against the
victim because of his or her involvement or participation as
any of the following:
a. A witness or party in any judicial or administrative
proceeding.
b. A person who produced records, documents, or other
objects in a judicial or administrative proceeding.
c. A person who provided to a law enforcement officer,
adult or juvenile probation officer, prosecuting attorney, or
judge any information relating to the commission or possible
commission of an offense under the laws of this state, of the
United States, or a violation of conditions of bail, pretrial
release, probation, or parole.
(4) The threat is made against an elected public
official or his or her staff.
(b) For the purposes of this section, a person
threatens another when:
(1) The person makes a statement verbally, in writing,
by means of an electronic communication device, or by any
other means to harm a person or property;
Page 3

other means to harm a person or property;
HB188 Engrossed
(2) The statement is communicated to another person;
(3) Under the circumstances, the threatened harm is
credible and imminent;
(4) The statement, on its face and under the
circumstances in which it is made, is so unequivocal,
immediate, and specific as to convey to the person threatened,
a purpose and an immediate prospect of execution of the
threat; and
(5) The statement causes the person to reasonably be in
fear for his or her own safety or for the object of the
threat.
(c) The crime of making a terrorist threat in the first
degree is a Class C felony."
"§13A-10-242
(a) A person commits the crime of making a terrorist
100 threat in the second degree when he or she, based on an
101 objective evaluation, credibly threatens to commit a crime of
102 violence against a person or to damage any property by use of
103 a bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, firearm, deadly
104 weapon, or other mechanism.
105 (b) For the purposes of this section, a person
106 threatens another when:
107 (1) The person makes a statement verbally, in writing,
108 by means of an electronic communication device, or by any
109 other means to harm a person or property;
110 (2) The person makes the statement with the intent to
111 cause fear or harm; and
112 (3) The statement is communicated to another person.
Page 4

(3) The statement is communicated to another person.
HB188 Engrossed
113 (c)(1) The crime of making a terrorist threat in the
114 second degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
115 (2) A second or subsequent violation of this section is
116 a Class D felony."
117 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
118 1, 2026.
Page 5

1, 2026.
HB188 Engrossed
119
120
121 House of Representatives
122 Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
123 to the House of Representatives
124 committee on Judiciary
125
126 Read for the second time and placed ................29-Jan-26
127 on the calendar:
128 2 amendments
129
130 Read for the third time and passed ................05-Feb-26
131 as amended
132 Yeas 83
133 Nays 10
134 Abstains 11
135
136
137 John Treadwell
138 Clerk
139
Page 6